District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.51

Policy; scope.

(a)

An Executive Service is established to ensure that the executive management of the District of Columbia government is responsive to the needs of the citizens and the goals of the government. Persons serving in the Executive Service shall assist the Mayor in advancing program responsibilities of the District government.

(b)

The Mayor shall nominate persons to serve as subordinate agency heads in the Executive Service pursuant to § 1-523.01. Individuals appointed to the Executive Service, other than the Chief Procurement Officer, shall serve at the pleasure of the Mayor.

(c)

The compensation and benefits system for the Executive Service is designed to attract and retain the highest caliber public administrators, who shall be accountable for the effective and efficient management of subordinate agencies.

(d)

Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions of this subchapter shall apply to persons appointed by the Mayor to serve as Chief of Police and Fire Chief.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1051
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-154, § 2, 55 DCR 3678

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01, § 2-1383, § 2-1431.03, § 5-105.01, § 5-402, § 5-1402, § 5-1501.03, § 7-761.06, and § 34-801.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-611.51.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-154, in the section name line, inserted “; policy”; and added subsec. (d).

Construction of Law

Construction of Law 12-124

Section 301 of D.C. Law 12-124 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (Public Law 105-33; 111 Stat. 712), except that § 47-395.4(b)(3) is expressly superseded. Further, nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of § 47-391.1 et seq. or of § 164 of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, approved November 19, 1997 (Public Law 105-100; 111 Stat. 2160).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.